Illinois, session 104th, SB2381.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Sex Offender Registration Act is amended by 5changing Section 2 as follows: 6    (730 ILCS 150/2)  (from Ch. 38, par. 222)7    Sec. 2. Definitions. 8    (A) As used in this Article, "sex offender" means any 9person who is:10        (1) charged pursuant to Illinois law, or any 11    substantially similar federal, Uniform Code of Military 12    Justice, sister state, or foreign country law, with a sex 13    offense set forth in subsection (B) of this Section or the 14    attempt to commit an included sex offense, and:15            (a) is convicted of such offense or an attempt to 16        commit such offense; or17            (b) is found not guilty by reason of insanity of 18        such offense or an attempt to commit such offense; or19            (c) is found not guilty by reason of insanity 20        pursuant to Section 104-25(c) of the Code of Criminal 21        Procedure of 1963 of such offense or an attempt to 22        commit such offense; or23            (d) is the subject of a finding not resulting in an   SB2381- 2 -LRB104 03039 RLC 13057 b1        acquittal at a hearing conducted pursuant to Section 2        104-25(a) of the Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963 3        for the alleged commission or attempted commission of 4        such offense; or5            (e) is found not guilty by reason of insanity 6        following a hearing conducted pursuant to a federal, 7        Uniform Code of Military Justice, sister state, or 8        foreign country law substantially similar to Section 9        104-25(c) of the Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963 of 10        such offense or of the attempted commission of such 11        offense; or12            (f) is the subject of a finding not resulting in an 13        acquittal at a hearing conducted pursuant to a 14        federal, Uniform Code of Military Justice, sister 15        state, or foreign country law substantially similar to 16        Section 104-25(a) of the Code of Criminal Procedure of 17        1963 for the alleged violation or attempted commission 18        of such offense; or19        (2) declared as a sexually dangerous person pursuant 20    to the Illinois Sexually Dangerous Persons Act, or any 21    substantially similar federal, Uniform Code of Military 22    Justice, sister state, or foreign country law; or23        (3) subject to the provisions of Section 2 of the 24    Interstate Agreements on Sexually Dangerous Persons Act; 25    or26        (4) found to be a sexually violent person pursuant to   SB2381- 3 -LRB104 03039 RLC 13057 b1    the Sexually Violent Persons Commitment Act or any 2    substantially similar federal, Uniform Code of Military 3    Justice, sister state, or foreign country law; or4        (5) adjudicated a juvenile delinquent as the result of 5    committing or attempting to commit an act which, if 6    committed by an adult, would constitute any of the 7    offenses specified in item (B), (C), or (C-5) of this 8    Section or a violation of any substantially similar 9    federal, Uniform Code of Military Justice, sister state, 10    or foreign country law, or found guilty under Article V of 11    the Juvenile Court Act of 1987 of committing or attempting 12    to commit an act which, if committed by an adult, would 13    constitute any of the offenses specified in item (B), (C), 14    or (C-5) of this Section or a violation of any 15    substantially similar federal, Uniform Code of Military 16    Justice, sister state, or foreign country law.17    Convictions that result from or are connected with the 18same act, or result from offenses committed at the same time, 19shall be counted for the purpose of this Article as one 20conviction. Any conviction set aside pursuant to law is not a 21conviction for purposes of this Article.22     For purposes of this Section, "convicted" shall have the 23same meaning as "adjudicated".24    (B) As used in this Article, "sex offense" means:25        (1) A violation of any of the following Sections of 26    the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012:  SB2381- 4 -LRB104 03039 RLC 13057 b1            11-20.1 (child pornography),2            11-20.1B or 11-20.3 (aggravated child 3        pornography), 4            11-6 (indecent solicitation of a child),5            11-9.1 (sexual exploitation of a child),6            11-9.2 (custodial sexual misconduct), 7            11-9.5 (sexual misconduct with a person with a 8        disability), 9            11-14.4 (promoting juvenile prostitution), 10            11-15.1 (soliciting for a juvenile prostitute),11            11-18.1 (patronizing a juvenile prostitute),12            11-17.1 (keeping a place of juvenile 13        prostitution),14            11-19.1 (juvenile pimping),15            11-19.2 (exploitation of a child), 16            11-25 (grooming), 17            11-26 (traveling to meet a minor or traveling to 18        meet a child), 19            11-1.20 or 12-13 (criminal sexual assault), 20            11-1.30 or 12-14 (aggravated criminal sexual 21        assault),22            11-1.40 or 12-14.1 (predatory criminal sexual 23        assault of a child),24            11-1.50 or 12-15 (criminal sexual abuse),25            11-1.60 or 12-16 (aggravated criminal sexual 26        abuse),  SB2381- 5 -LRB104 03039 RLC 13057 b1            12-33 (ritualized abuse of a child).2            An attempt to commit any of these offenses.3        (1.5) A violation of any of the following Sections of 4    the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, 5    when the victim is a person under 18 years of age, the 6    defendant is not a parent of the victim, the offense was 7    sexually motivated as defined in Section 10 of the Sex 8    Offender Evaluation and Treatment Act, and the offense was 9    committed on or after January 1, 1996:10            10-1 (kidnapping),11            10-2 (aggravated kidnapping),12            10-3 (unlawful restraint),13            10-3.1 (aggravated unlawful restraint).14        If the offense was committed before January 1, 1996, 15    it is a sex offense requiring registration only when the 16    person is convicted of any felony after July 1, 2011, and 17    paragraph (2.1) of subsection (c) of Section 3 of this Act 18    applies. 19        (1.6) First degree murder under Section 9-1 of the 20    Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, 21    provided the offense was sexually motivated as defined in 22    Section 10 of the Sex Offender Management Board Act.23        (1.7) (Blank).24        (1.8) A violation or attempted violation of Section 25    11-11 (sexual relations within families) of the Criminal 26    Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, and the offense   SB2381- 6 -LRB104 03039 RLC 13057 b1    was committed on or after June 1, 1997. If the offense was 2    committed before June 1, 1997, it is a sex offense 3    requiring registration only when the person is convicted 4    of any felony after July 1, 2011, and paragraph (2.1) of 5    subsection (c) of Section 3 of this Act applies. 6        (1.9) Child abduction under paragraph (10) of 7    subsection (b) of Section 10-5 of the Criminal Code of 8    1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012 committed by luring or 9    attempting to lure a child under the age of 16 into a motor 10    vehicle, building, house trailer, or dwelling place 11    without the consent of the parent or lawful custodian of 12    the child for other than a lawful purpose and the offense 13    was committed on or after January 1, 1998, provided the 14    offense was sexually motivated as defined in Section 10 of 15    the Sex Offender Management Board Act. If the offense was 16    committed before January 1, 1998, it is a sex offense 17    requiring registration only when the person is convicted 18    of any felony after July 1, 2011, and paragraph (2.1) of 19    subsection (c) of Section 3 of this Act applies. 20        (1.10) A violation or attempted violation of any of 21    the following Sections of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the 22    Criminal Code of 2012 when the offense was committed on or 23    after July 1, 1999:24            10-4 (forcible detention, if the victim is under 25        18 years of age), provided the offense was sexually 26        motivated as defined in Section 10 of the Sex Offender   SB2381- 7 -LRB104 03039 RLC 13057 b1        Management Board Act,2            11-6.5 (indecent solicitation of an adult),3            11-14.3 that involves soliciting for a prostitute, 4        or 11-15 (soliciting for a prostitute, if the victim 5        is under 18 years of age),6            subdivision (a)(2)(A) or (a)(2)(B) of Section 7        11-14.3, or Section 11-16 (pandering, if the victim is 8        under 18 years of age),9            11-18 (patronizing a prostitute, if the victim is 10        under 18 years of age),11            subdivision (a)(2)(C) of Section 11-14.3, or 12        Section 11-19 (pimping, if the victim is under 18 13        years of age).14        If the offense was committed before July 1, 1999, it 15    is a sex offense requiring registration only when the 16    person is convicted of any felony after July 1, 2011, and 17    paragraph (2.1) of subsection (c) of Section 3 of this Act 18    applies. 19        (1.11) A violation or attempted violation of any of 20    the following Sections of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the 21    Criminal Code of 2012 when the offense was committed on or 22    after August 22, 2002:23            11-9 or 11-30 (public indecency for a third or 24        subsequent conviction).25        If the third or subsequent conviction was imposed 26    before August 22, 2002, it is a sex offense requiring   SB2381- 8 -LRB104 03039 RLC 13057 b1    registration only when the person is convicted of any 2    felony after July 1, 2011, and paragraph (2.1) of 3    subsection (c) of Section 3 of this Act applies. 4        (1.12) A violation or attempted violation of Section 5    5.1 of the Wrongs to Children Act or Section 11-9.1A of the 6    Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012 7    (permitting sexual abuse) when the offense was committed 8    on or after August 22, 2002. If the offense was committed 9    before August 22, 2002, it is a sex offense requiring 10    registration only when the person is convicted of any 11    felony after July 1, 2011, and paragraph (2.1) of 12    subsection (c) of Section 3 of this Act applies. 13        (1.13) A violation of Section 26-4 of the Criminal 14    Code of 2012 (unauthorized video recording and live video 15    transmission), when the victim is a person under 18 years 16    of age, the defendant is not a parent of the victim, the 17    offense was sexually motivated as defined in Section 10 of 18    the Sex Offender Evaluation and Treatment Act, and the 19    offense was committed on or after the effective date of 20    this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly. 21        (2) A violation of any former law of this State 22    substantially equivalent to any offense listed in 23    subsection (B) of this Section.24    (C) A conviction for an offense of federal law, Uniform 25Code of Military Justice, or the law of another state or a 26foreign country that is substantially equivalent to any   SB2381- 9 -LRB104 03039 RLC 13057 b1offense listed in subsections (B), (C), (E), and (E-5) of this 2Section shall constitute a conviction for the purpose of this 3Article. A finding or adjudication as a sexually dangerous 4person or a sexually violent person under any federal law, 5Uniform Code of Military Justice, or the law of another state 6or foreign country that is substantially equivalent to the 7Sexually Dangerous Persons Act or the Sexually Violent Persons 8Commitment Act shall constitute an adjudication for the 9purposes of this Article.10    (C-5) A person at least 17 years of age at the time of the 11commission of the offense who is convicted of first degree 12murder under Section 9-1 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the 13Criminal Code of 2012, against a person under 18 years of age, 14shall be required to register for natural life. A conviction 15for an offense of federal, Uniform Code of Military Justice, 16sister state, or foreign country law that is substantially 17equivalent to any offense listed in subsection (C-5) of this 18Section shall constitute a conviction for the purpose of this 19Article. This subsection (C-5) applies to a person who 20committed the offense before June 1, 1996 if: (i) the person is 21incarcerated in an Illinois Department of Corrections facility 22on August 20, 2004 (the effective date of Public Act 93-977), 23or (ii) subparagraph (i) does not apply and the person is 24convicted of any felony after July 1, 2011, and paragraph 25(2.1) of subsection (c) of Section 3 of this Act applies.26    (C-6) A person who is convicted or adjudicated delinquent   SB2381- 10 -LRB104 03039 RLC 13057 b1of first degree murder as defined in Section 9-1 of the 2Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, against a 3person 18 years of age or over, shall be required to register 4for his or her natural life. A conviction for an offense of 5federal, Uniform Code of Military Justice, sister state, or 6foreign country law that is substantially equivalent to any 7offense listed in subsection (C-6) of this Section shall 8constitute a conviction for the purpose of this Article. This 9subsection (C-6) does not apply to those individuals released 10from incarceration more than 10 years prior to January 1, 2012 11(the effective date of Public Act 97-154). 12    (D) As used in this Article, "law enforcement agency 13having jurisdiction" means the Chief of Police in each of the 14municipalities in which the sex offender expects to reside, 15work, or attend school (1) upon his or her discharge, parole or 16release or (2) during the service of his or her sentence of 17probation or conditional discharge, or the Sheriff of the 18county, in the event no Police Chief exists or if the offender 19intends to reside, work, or attend school in an unincorporated 20area. "Law enforcement agency having jurisdiction" includes 21the location where out-of-state students attend school and 22where out-of-state employees are employed or are otherwise 23required to register.24    (D-1) As used in this Article, "supervising officer" means 25the assigned Illinois Department of Corrections parole agent 26or county probation officer.   SB2381- 11 -LRB104 03039 RLC 13057 b1    (E) As used in this Article, "sexual predator" means any 2person who, after July 1, 1999, is:3        (1) Convicted for an offense of federal, Uniform Code 4    of Military Justice, sister state, or foreign country law 5    that is substantially equivalent to any offense listed in 6    subsection (E) or (E-5) of this Section shall constitute a 7    conviction for the purpose of this Article. Convicted of a 8    violation or attempted violation of any of the following 9    Sections of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code 10    of 2012:11            10-5.1 (luring of a minor),12            11-14.4 that involves keeping a place of juvenile 13        prostitution, or 11-17.1 (keeping a place of juvenile 14        prostitution),15            subdivision (a)(2) or (a)(3) of Section 11-14.4, 16        or Section 11-19.1 (juvenile pimping),17            subdivision (a)(4) of Section 11-14.4, or Section 18        11-19.2 (exploitation of a child),19            11-20.1 (child pornography),20            11-20.1B or 11-20.3 (aggravated child 21        pornography),22            11-1.20 or 12-13 (criminal sexual assault),23            11-1.30 or 12-14 (aggravated criminal sexual 24        assault),25            11-1.40 or 12-14.1 (predatory criminal sexual 26        assault of a child),  SB2381- 12 -LRB104 03039 RLC 13057 b1            11-1.60 or 12-16 (aggravated criminal sexual 2        abuse),3            12-33 (ritualized abuse of a child);4        (2) (blank);5        (3) declared as a sexually dangerous person pursuant 6    to the Sexually Dangerous Persons Act or any substantially 7    similar federal, Uniform Code of Military Justice, sister 8    state, or foreign country law;9        (4) found to be a sexually violent person pursuant to 10    the Sexually Violent Persons Commitment Act or any 11    substantially similar federal, Uniform Code of Military 12    Justice, sister state, or foreign country law;13        (5) convicted of a second or subsequent offense which 14    requires registration pursuant to this Act. For purposes 15    of this paragraph (5), "convicted" shall include a 16    conviction under any substantially similar Illinois, 17    federal, Uniform Code of Military Justice, sister state, 18    or foreign country law;19        (6) (blank); or20        (7) if the person was convicted of an offense set 21    forth in this subsection (E) on or before July 1, 1999, the 22    person is a sexual predator for whom registration is 23    required only when the person is convicted of a felony 24    offense after July 1, 2011, and paragraph (2.1) of 25    subsection (c) of Section 3 of this Act applies. 26    (E-5) As used in this Article, "sexual predator" also   SB2381- 13 -LRB104 03039 RLC 13057 b1means a person convicted of a violation or attempted violation 2of any of the following Sections of the Criminal Code of 1961 3or the Criminal Code of 2012: 4        (1) Section 9-1 (first degree murder, when the victim 5    was a person under 18 years of age and the defendant was at 6    least 17 years of age at the time of the commission of the 7    offense, provided the offense was sexually motivated as 8    defined in Section 10 of the Sex Offender Management Board 9    Act);10        (2) Section 11-9.5 (sexual misconduct with a person 11    with a disability);12        (3) when the victim is a person under 18 years of age, 13    the defendant is not a parent of the victim, the offense 14    was sexually motivated as defined in Section 10 of the Sex 15    Offender Management Board Act, and the offense was 16    committed on or after January 1, 1996: (A) Section 10-1 17    (kidnapping), (B) Section 10-2 (aggravated kidnapping), 18    (C) Section 10-3 (unlawful restraint), and (D) Section 19    10-3.1 (aggravated unlawful restraint); and20        (4) Section 10-5(b)(10) (child abduction committed by 21    luring or attempting to lure a child under the age of 16 22    into a motor vehicle, building, house trailer, or dwelling 23    place without the consent of the parent or lawful 24    custodian of the child for other than a lawful purpose and 25    the offense was committed on or after January 1, 1998, 26    provided the offense was sexually motivated as defined in   SB2381- 14 -LRB104 03039 RLC 13057 b1    Section 10 of the Sex Offender Management Board Act).2    (E-10) As used in this Article, "sexual predator" also 3means a person required to register in another State due to a 4conviction, adjudication or other action of any court 5triggering an obligation to register as a sex offender, sexual 6predator, or substantially similar status under the laws of 7that State. 8    (F) As used in this Article, "out-of-state student" means 9any sex offender, as defined in this Section, or sexual 10predator who is enrolled in Illinois, on a full-time or 11part-time basis, in any public or private educational 12institution, including, but not limited to, any secondary 13school, trade or professional institution, or institution of 14higher learning.15    (G) As used in this Article, "out-of-state employee" means 16any sex offender, as defined in this Section, or sexual 17predator who works in Illinois, regardless of whether the 18individual receives payment for services performed, for a 19period of time of 10 or more days or for an aggregate period of 20time of 30 or more days during any calendar year. Persons who 21operate motor vehicles in the State accrue one day of 22employment time for any portion of a day spent in Illinois.23    (H) As used in this Article, "school" means any public or 24private educational institution, including, but not limited 25to, any elementary or secondary school, trade or professional 26institution, or institution of higher education.  SB2381- 15 -LRB104 03039 RLC 13057 b1    (I) As used in this Article, "fixed residence" means any 2and all places that a sex offender resides for an aggregate 3period of time of 5 or more days in a calendar year. 4    (J) As used in this Article, "Internet protocol address" 5means the string of numbers by which a location on the Internet 6is identified by routers or other computers connected to the 7Internet.8(Source: P.A. 100-428, eff. 1-1-18.)